csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cw.yaml
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: mizhok
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: mizhoshin
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: mizh
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [mizhoshinaan,mizhoshinaang]
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: miizhwaadaanig
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     mizho+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: miizhwaadaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimizhogosiinaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimizhogosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimizhosiimwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimizhosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimizhogosiidogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimizhogosiidog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimizhogoosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimizhogonaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimizhogonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimizhomwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimizhnaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimizhogodogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimizhogodog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimizhogoonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimizhogosiinan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimizhogosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimizhosiim
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimizhosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimizhogosiig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimizhogosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimizhogoosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimizhogonan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimizhogon
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimizhom
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimizh
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimizhogoog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimizhog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimizhogoo
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimizhogosiinaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimizhogosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimizhosiimwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimizhosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimizhogosiibaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimizhogosiiban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimizhogoosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimizhogonaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimizhogonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimizhomwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimizhnaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimizhogobaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimizhogoban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimizhogoonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimizhogosiinaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimizhogosiinaawaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimizhosinooninimwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimizhogosiiwaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimizhogosiiwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimizhogoosiimwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimizhogoosiimwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimizhogonaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimizhogonaawaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimizhoninimwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimizhogowaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimizhogowaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimizhogoomwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimizhogoomwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimizhogosiinaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimizhogosiinaawaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimizhosinooninim
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimizhogosiiwaag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimizhogosiiwaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimizhogoosiim
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimizhogoosiim
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimizhogonaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimizhogonaawaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimizhoninim
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimizhogowaag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimizhogowaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimizhogoom
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimizhogoom
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimizhogosiinaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimizhogosiinaawaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimizhosinooninimwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimizhogosiiwaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimizhogosiiwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimizhogoosiimwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimizhogoosiimwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimizhogonaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimizhogonaawaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimizhoninimwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimizhogowaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimizhogowaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimizhogoomwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimizhogoomwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimizhogosiinaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimizhogosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimizhosinooninaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimizhogosiidogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimizhogosiidog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimizhogoosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimizhogoosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimizhogonaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimizhogonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimizhoninaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimizhogodogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimizhogodog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimizhogoonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimizhogoonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimizhogosiinan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimizhogosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimizhosinoon
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimizhogosiig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimizhogosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimizhogoosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimizhogoosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimizhogonan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimizhogon
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimizhon
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimizhogoog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimizhog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimizhogoo
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimizhogoo
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimizhogosiinaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimizhogosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimizhosinooninaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimizhogosiibaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimizhogosiiban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimizhogoosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimizhogoosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimizhogonaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimizhogonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimizhoninaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimizhogobaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimizhogoban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimizhogoonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimizhogoonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimizhomaasiidogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiwaawaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiidogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omizhwaasiwaawaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omizhwaasiidogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimizhomaasiwaanaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiwaanaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlObv: mizhomaasiidogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimizhomaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimizhomaawaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimizhomaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omizhwaawaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omizhwaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimizhomaanaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimizhomaanaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlObv: mizhomaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimizhomaasii'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiwaawaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimizhomaasii'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omizhwaasiwaawaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omizhwaasii'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimizhomaasiwaanaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiwaanaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlObv: mizhomaasiiwa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimizhomaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimizhomaawaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimizhomaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omizhwaawaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omizhwaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimizhomaanaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimizhomaanaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlObv: mizhomaawa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimizhomaasiibane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiwaawaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiibane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omizhwaasiwaawaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omizhwaasiibane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimizhomaasiwaanaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimizhomaasiwaanaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlObv: mizhomaasiibane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimizhomaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimizhomaawaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimizhomaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omizhwaawaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omizhwaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimizhomaanaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimizhomaanaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlObv: mizhomaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omizhogosiinaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omizhogosiinaawaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimizhwaasiidogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiwaawaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiidogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omizhogosiiwaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omizhogosiiwaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimizhwaasiwaanaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiwaanaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mizhwaasiidogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omizhogonaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omizhogonaawaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimizhwaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimizhwaawaadogenag
